Utah statutes.
31A-22-507.   Credit union groups.

(1)  The lives of a group of individuals may be insured under a policy issued to a policyholder who is:

(a)  a credit union; or

(b)  trustees or agents designated by two or more credit unions. 

(2)  A policy described in Subsection (1) shall insure members of a credit union for the benefit of persons other than:

(a)  the credit union;

(b)  trustees of the credit union;

(c)  agents of the credit union; or

(d)  an official of an entity described in Subsections (2)(a) through (c).

(3)  The policies are subject to the requirements of this Subsection (3).

(a)  The persons eligible for insurance are:

(i)  all of the members of the credit union; or

(ii)  all of any classes of the members of the credit union.

(b)  The premiums shall be paid by the policyholder.  Except as provided in Section 31A-22-512, a policy on which no part of the premium is collected from the covered members specifically for their insurance shall insure all eligible members.

(c)  A group policy issued under this section is not subject to Sections 31A-22-517 through 31A-22-521.

